Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-9506
Direct provider; limitation on activities; duty.

(1) A direct provider shall not refuse to accept a new direct patient or discontinue care to an existing direct patient solely because of the patient’s health status.

(2) A direct provider shall provide at least sixty days’ advance notice to an existing direct patient of any change to the direct service charge applicable to the patient.

(3) A direct provider shall not pay for health care services covered by an agreement rendered to patients by direct providers other than the direct providers in the same direct primary care practice or their employees.

Laws 2016, LB817, § 6.
July 21, 2016